Utah statutes.
53A-24-110.   Purpose for establishing the office.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that all activities of the office and its subordinate components be conducted in such a manner that persons with disabilities will be assisted, so far as reasonably possible, to take their rightful place in open society as independent and self-supporting individuals.

(2)  Neither the office nor any of its parts may assist or support any activity that will result in unnecessary continuation of a dependent or isolated state or unnecessarily separate persons with  disabilities from open society.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

